District of Columbia statutes.
31-4314

False statements in application for policy.

The falsity of a statement in the application for any policy of insurance shall not bar the right to recovery thereunder unless such false statement was made with intent to deceive or unless it materially affected either the acceptance of the risk or the hazard assumed by the company.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1133, ch. 672, ch. II, § 15
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(i), 44 DCR 1730
Form and contents of insurance contracts, see §§ 31-4703, 31-4712.
Industrial policies, special provisions, see § 31-4801 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 35-414.
1973 Ed., § 35-414.
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-4301.